California statutes. Education Code
(e) This section does not supersede, or otherwise limit or modify, the provisions of Section 48907.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that free speech rights are subject to reasonable time, place, and manner regulations.

(g) An employee shall not be dismissed, suspended, disciplined, reassigned, transferred, or otherwise retaliated against solely for acting to protect a pupil engaged in conduct authorized under this section, or refusing to infringe upon conduct that is protected by this section, the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, or Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 142, Sec. 3.   (SB 438)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notification of Parent or Guardian [48980. - 48986.]

48980.

(a) At the beginning of the first semester or quarter of the regular school term, the governing board of each school district shall notify the parent or guardian of a minor pupil regarding the right or responsibility of the parent or guardian under Sections 35291, 46014, 46015, 48205, 48207, 48208, 49403, 49423, 49451, 49472, and 51938 and Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 32255) of Part 19 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(b) The notification also shall advise the parent or guardian of the availability of individualized instruction as prescribed by Section 48206.3, and of the program prescribed by Article 9 (commencing with Section 49510) of Chapter 9.

(c) The notification also shall advise the
 parents and guardians of all pupils attending a school within the school district of the schedule of minimum days and pupil-free staff development days, and if minimum or pupil-free staff development days are scheduled thereafter, the governing board of the school district shall notify parents and guardians of the affected pupils as early as possible, but not later than one month before the scheduled minimum or pupil-free day.

(d) The notification also may advise the parent or guardian of the importance of investing for future college or university education for their children and of considering appropriate investment options, including, but not limited to, United States savings bonds.

(e) Each school district that elects to provide a fingerprinting program pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 32390) of Chapter 3 of Part 19 of Division 1 of Title 1 shall inform parents
 or guardians of the program as specified in Section 32390.

(f) The notification also shall include a copy of the written policy of the school district on sexual harassment established pursuant to Section 231.5, as it relates to pupils.

(g) The notification shall advise the parent or guardian of all existing statutory attendance options and local attendance options available in the school district. This notification component shall include all options for meeting residency requirements for school attendance, programmatic options offered within the local attendance areas, and any special programmatic options available on both an interdistrict and intradistrict basis. This notification component also shall include a description of all options, a description of the procedure for application for alternative attendance areas or programs, an application form from the school district for
 requesting a change of attendance, and a description of the appeals process available, if any, for a parent or guardian denied a change of attendance. The notification component also shall include an explanation of the existing statutory attendance options, including, but not limited to, those available under Section 35160.5, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 46600) of Part 26, and subdivision (b) of Section 48204. The department shall produce this portion of the notification and shall distribute it to all school districts.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that the governing board of each school district annually review the enrollment options available to the pupils within its school district and that the school districts strive to make available enrollment options that meet the diverse needs, potential, and interests of the pupils of California.

(i) The notification shall
 advise the parent or guardian that a pupil shall not have a grade reduced or lose academic credit for any absence or absences excused pursuant to Section 48205 if missed assignments and tests that can reasonably be provided are satisfactorily completed within a reasonable period of time, and shall include the full text of Section 48205.

(j) The notification shall advise the parent or guardian of the availability of state funds to cover the costs of advanced placement examination fees pursuant to Section 52242.

(k) The notification to the parent or guardian of a minor pupil enrolled in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, also shall include the information required pursuant to Section 51229.

(l) If a school district elects to allow a career technical education course to satisfy the requirement imposed by subparagraph (E)
 of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3, the school district shall include, in the notification required pursuant to this section, both of the following:

(1) Information about the high school graduation requirements of the school district and how each requirement satisfies or does not satisfy the subject matter requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California.

(2) A complete list of career technical education courses offered by the school district that satisfy the subject matter requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California, and which of the specific college admission requirements these courses satisfy.

(m) A school district that elects to adopt a policy regarding the transfer of pupils pursuant to Article
 1.5 (commencing with Section 48929) shall inform parents or guardians of the policy in the notification required pursuant to this section.

(n) The notification to the parents or guardians of pupils admitted to, or advancing to, grades 11 and 12 shall include the information required pursuant to Section 48980.5.

(o) The notification also shall advise the parent or guardian of the protections, requirements, and responsibilities prescribed in Assembly Bill 715 of the 2025–26 Regular Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 6.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

48980.3.

The notification required pursuant to Section 48980 shall include information regarding pesticide products as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17612.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 718, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

48980.4.

(a) (1) Until June 30, 2026, the notification required pursuant to Section 48980 for pupils admitted to, or advancing to, grade 6 shall include a notification to the pupil’s parent or guardian containing a statement about the state’s public policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 120336 of the Health and Safety Code, advising that the pupil adhere to current immunization guidelines, as recommended
 by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and
 Prevention as of January 1, 2025, the American Academy of Pediatrics, and the American Academy of Family Physicians, regarding full human papillomavirus (HPV) immunization before admission or advancement to the grade 8.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the notification required pursuant to Section 48980 for pupils admitted to, or advancing to, grade 6 shall include a notification to the pupil’s parent or guardian containing a statement about the state’s public policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 120336 of the Health and Safety Code, advising that the pupil adhere to current immunization guidelines, as
 recommended by the State Department of Public Health, in accordance with Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code, regarding full human papillomavirus (HPV) immunization before admission or advancement to the grade 8.

(b) The notification sent pursuant to subdivision (a) shall conform to the notification requirements outlined in this article.

(c) The notification sent pursuant to subdivision (a) shall also include the statement specified in subdivision (c) of Section 120336 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 10.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48980.5.

(a) The notification required pursuant to Section 48980 for the parents or guardians of pupils admitted to, or advancing to, grades 11 and 12 shall include information on local apprenticeship programs and preapprenticeship programs as follows:

(1) A school district shall use the database of registered program sponsors provided on the internet website of the Department of Industrial Relations’ Division of Apprenticeship Standards.

(2) A school district may use contact information contained in the Division of Apprenticeship Standard’s database to obtain information or materials, including, but not limited to, pamphlets or brochures.

(b) If a school district maintains an internet website, the school district shall make the Division of Apprenticeship Standards’ database accessible through a direct link on its internet website.

(c) The notification sent pursuant to subdivision (a) shall conform to the notification requirements outlined in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 62, Sec. 2.   (AB 2179)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48980.6.

(a) (1) At the beginning of the first semester or quarter of the regular school term, a local educational agency shall notify the parents or guardians of pupils admitted to, or advancing to, grades 7 to 12, inclusive, of any dual enrollment or International Baccalaureate courses offered by the local educational agency.

(2) School districts shall provide the notice as part of the annual notification required pursuant to Section 48980.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school
 district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   (AB 1796)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48981.

The notice shall be provided at the time of registration for the first semester or quarter of the regular school term. The notice may be provided using any of the following methods:

(a) By regular mail.

(b) If a parent or guardian requests to receive the notice in electronic format, by providing access to the notice electronically. Notice provided in electronic format shall conform to the requirements of Section 48985.

(c) By any other method normally used to
 communicate with the parents or guardians in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   (AB 2262)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

48982.

(a) The notice shall be signed by the parent or guardian and returned to the school. Signature of the notice is an acknowledgment by the parent or guardian that he or she has been informed of his or her rights but does not indicate that consent to participate in any particular program has either been given or withheld.

(b) If the notice is provided in electronic format pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48981, the parent or guardian shall submit to the school a signed acknowledgment of receipt of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 17, Sec. 2.   (AB 2262)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

48983.

If any activity covered by the sections set forth in Section 48980 will be undertaken by the school during the forthcoming school term, the notice shall state that fact and shall also state the approximate date upon which any of such activities will occur.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48984.

No school district shall undertake any activity covered by the sections set forth in Section 48980 with respect to any particular pupil unless the parent or guardian has been informed of such action pursuant to this article or has received separate special notification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48985.

(a) If 15 percent or more of the pupils enrolled in a public school that provides instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, speak a single primary language other than English, as determined from the census data submitted to the department pursuant to Section 52164 in the preceding year, all notices, reports, statements, or records sent to the parent or guardian of any such pupil by the public school or school district shall, in addition to being written in English, be written in the primary language, and may be responded to either in English or the primary language.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 64001, the department shall monitor adherence to the requirements of subdivision (a) as part of
 its regular monitoring and review of public schools and school districts and shall determine the types of documents and languages a public school or school district translates to a primary language other than English, the availability of these documents to parents or guardians who speak a primary language other than English, and the gaps in translations of these documents.

(c) Based on census data submitted to the department pursuant to Section 52164 in the preceding fiscal year, the department shall notify a school district, by August 1 of each year, of the schools within the school district, and the primary language other than English, for which the translation of documents is required pursuant to subdivision (a). The department shall make that notification using electronic methods.

(d) The department shall use existing resources to comply with subdivisions (b) and
 (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 35.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48985.5.

(a) A local educational agency shall inform the parents or guardians of each enrolled pupil about all of the following:

(1) The dangers associated with using synthetic drugs that are not prescribed by a physician, such as fentanyl.

(2) The possibility that dangerous synthetic drugs can be found in counterfeit pills.

(3) The risk of social media platforms being used as a way to market and sell synthetic drugs, such as fentanyl.

(b) (1) The information shall be annually provided to parents or guardians at the beginning of the first semester or quarter
 of the regular school term.

(2) The information may be provided to parents or guardians pursuant to Section 48980.

(c) If a local educational agency maintains an internet website, the local educational agency shall post the information on their internet website and shall ensure that each individual school within the local educational agency that maintains an individual internet website also posts the information on that school’s internet website.

(d) As used in this section, a “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (AB 2690)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48986.

(a) (1) A local educational agency shall inform, through a notice in the manner prescribed in this section, the parents or guardians of each enrolled pupil of California’s child access prevention laws and laws relating to the safe storage of firearms, including, but not limited to, Division 4 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(2) The notice shall be provided annually at the beginning of the first semester or quarter of the regular school term.

(3) The notice shall be informed by the most updated model language developed pursuant to subdivision
 (c).

(b) (1) The notice described in subdivision (a) shall be made using any of the methods described in Section 48981 that apply and may be provided as a single notice for multiple pupils living in the same household.

(2) A school district shall provide the notice as part of the annual notification required pursuant to Section 48980.

(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2023, the department shall develop, in consultation with the Department of Justice, model language for
 the notice described in subdivision (a).

(2) On or before July 1, 2024, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall update as necessary for any change in the law, in consultation with the Department of Justice, the model language developed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The department shall share the model language developed and updated pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) in both of the following manners:

(A) With all local educational agencies for the purposes described in subdivision (a).

(B) Upon request, with any private school for distribution or potential distribution by the private school.

(d) A local educational agency, a private school, and the department are immune from civil liability for any damages allegedly caused by, arising out of, or relating to the
 notice if the entity provided the notice using the model language provided to it by the department.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: 

(1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school. 

(2) “Private school” means a person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction in the state. 

(3) “Private school instruction” means instruction at the elementary or high school level for one or more pupils who are 6 to 18 years of age, inclusive. Private school instruction includes, but is not limited to, instruction by
 conventional or traditional private schools, private school satellite programs, private online or virtual schools, and certified nonpublic nonsectarian schools.

(f) (1) If a local educational agency provides a notice required by Section 49392, the local educational agency shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), as applicable.

(2) If the department develops model language pursuant to Section 49391, the department shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of subdivision (c).

(3) This subdivision shall only become operative if Senate Bill 906 of the 2021–22 Regular Session is enacted and becomes effective on or before January 1, 2023, and adds Sections 49391 and 49392 to the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   (AB 452)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Guidelines for Filing Complaint of Child Abuse [48987. - 48987.]

48987.

The governing board of a school district or county office of education shall upon request disseminate the guidelines adopted by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 33308.1 to parents or guardians of minor pupils in the primary language of the parent or guardian. The governing board of a school district or county office of education is encouraged to inform a parent or guardian, that desires to file a complaint against a school employee or other person that commits an act of child abuse as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code against a pupil at a schoolsite, of the procedures for filing the complaint with local child protective agencies pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act, established pursuant to Chapter 1444 of the Statutes of 1987. In the case of oral communications with the parent or guardian whose primary language is other than English, concerning that guideline or the procedures for filing child abuse complaints, the governing board shall provide an interpreter for that parent or guardian.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1172, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Prohibition of Corporal Punishment [49000. - 49001.]

49000.

The Legislature finds and declares that the protection against corporal punishment, which extends to other citizens in other walks of life, should include children while they are under the control of the public schools. Children of school age are at the most vulnerable and impressionable period of their lives and it is wholly reasonable that the safeguards to the integrity and sanctity of their bodies should be, at this tender age, at least equal to that afforded to other citizens.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1069, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

49001.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “corporal punishment” means the willful infliction of, or willfully causing the infliction of, physical pain on a pupil. An amount of force that is reasonable and necessary for a person employed by or engaged in a public school to quell a disturbance threatening physical injury to persons or damage to property, for purposes of self-defense, or to obtain possession of weapons or other dangerous objects within the control of the pupil, is not and shall not be construed to be corporal punishment within the meaning and intent of this section. Physical pain or discomfort caused by athletic competition or other such recreational activity, voluntarily engaged in by the pupil, is not and shall not be construed to be
 corporal punishment within the meaning and intent of this section.

(b) No person employed by or engaged in a public school shall inflict, or cause to be inflicted corporal punishment upon a pupil. Every resolution, bylaw, rule, ordinance, or other act or authority permitting or authorizing the infliction of corporal punishment upon a pupil attending a public school is void and unenforceable.

(c) For purposes of this section, “public school” includes a school operated by a school district or a county office of education, a charter school, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school, and a state special school for the blind or the deaf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (SB 373)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.2. Restraint and Seclusion [49005. - 49006.4.]

49005.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) While it is appropriate to intervene in an emergency to prevent a pupil from imminent risk of serious physical self-harm or harm of others, restraint and seclusion are dangerous interventions, with certain known practices posing a great risk to child health and safety.

(b) United States Department of Education guidelines specify that the use of restraint and seclusion must be consistent with the child’s right to be treated with dignity and to be free from abuse.

(c) Restraint and seclusion should only be used as a safety measure of last resort, and should never be used as punishment or discipline or
 for staff convenience.

(d) Restraint and seclusion may cause serious injury or long lasting trauma and death, even when done safely and correctly.

(e) There is no evidence that restraint or seclusion is effective in reducing the problem behaviors that frequently precipitate the use of those techniques.

(f) Pupils with disabilities and pupils of color, especially African American boys, are disproportionately subject to restraint and seclusion.

(g) Well-established California law already regulates restraint techniques in a number of settings, including general acute care hospitals, acute psychiatric hospitals, psychiatric health facilities, crisis stabilization units, community treatment facilities, group homes, skilled nursing facilities, intermediate
 care facilities, community care facilities, and mental health rehabilitation centers. These minimal protections should be provided to all pupils in schools.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that schools foster learning in a safe and healthy environment and provide adequate safeguards to prevent harm, and even death, to children in school.

(i) This article is intended to be read to be consistent with, and does not change any requirements, limitations, or protections in, existing law pertaining to pupils with exceptional needs.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature to prohibit dangerous practices. Restraint and seclusion, as described in this article, do not further a child’s education. At the same time, the Legislature recognizes that if an emergency situation arises, the ability of education
 personnel to act in that emergency to safeguard a pupil or others from imminent physical harm should not be restricted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 62.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

49005.1.

The following definitions apply to this article:

(a) “Behavioral restraint” means “mechanical restraint” or “physical restraint,” as defined in this section, used as an intervention when a pupil presents an immediate danger to self or to others. “Behavioral restraint” does not include postural restraints or devices used to improve a pupil’s mobility and independent functioning rather than to restrict movement.

(b) “Educational provider” means a person who provides educational or related services, support, or other assistance to a pupil enrolled in an educational program provided by a local educational agency or a nonpublic school or agency.

(c) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, the California Schools for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind.

(d) (1) “Mechanical restraint” means the use of a device or equipment to restrict a pupil’s freedom of movement.

(2) (A) “Mechanical restraint” does not include the use of devices by peace officers or security personnel for detention or for public safety purposes.

(B) “Mechanical restraint” does not include the use of devices by trained school personnel, or by a pupil, prescribed by an appropriate medical or related services professional, if the device
 is used for the specific and approved purpose for which the device or equipment was prescribed, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Adaptive devices or mechanical supports used to achieve proper body position, balance, or alignment to allow greater freedom of mobility than would be possible without the use of such devices or mechanical supports.

(ii) Vehicle safety restraints when used as intended during the transport of a pupil in a moving vehicle.

(iii) Restraints for medical immobilization.

(iv) Orthopedically prescribed devices that permit a pupil to participate in activities without risk of harm.

(e) “Nonpublic school or agency” means any nonpublic school or nonpublic agency, including both in-state and out-of-state nonpublic schools and nonpublic agencies.

(f) (1) “Physical restraint” means a personal restriction that immobilizes or reduces the ability of a pupil to move the pupil’s torso, arms, legs, or head freely. “Physical restraint” does not include a physical escort, which means a temporary touching or holding of the hand, wrist, arm, shoulder, or back for the purpose of inducing a pupil who is acting out to walk to a safe location.

(2) “Physical restraint” does not include the use of force by peace officers or security personnel for detention or for public safety purposes.

(g) “Prone restraint” means the application of a behavioral restraint on a pupil in a facedown position for any period of time and includes the procedure known as prone containment.

(h) “Pupil” means a pupil enrolled in preschool, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and receiving educational services from an educational provider.

(i) “Seclusion” means the involuntary confinement of a pupil alone in a room or area from which the pupil is physically prevented from leaving. “Seclusion” does not include a timeout, which is a behavior management technique that is part of an approved program, that involves the monitored separation of the pupil in a nonlocked setting, and is implemented for the purpose of
 calming.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 857, Sec. 2.   (SB 483)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

49005.2.

A pupil has the right to be free from the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints of any form imposed as a means of coercion, discipline, convenience, or retaliation by staff. This right includes, but is not limited to, the right to be free from the use of a drug administered to the pupil in order to control the pupil’s behavior or to restrict the pupil’s freedom of movement, if that drug is not a standard treatment for the pupil’s medical or psychiatric condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49005.4.

An educational provider may use seclusion or a behavioral restraint only to control behavior that poses a clear and present danger of serious physical harm to the pupil or others that cannot be immediately prevented by a response that is less restrictive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49005.6.

An educational provider shall avoid, whenever possible, the use of seclusion or behavioral restraint techniques.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49005.8.

(a) An educational provider shall not do any of the following:

(1) Use seclusion or a behavioral restraint for the purpose of coercion, discipline, convenience, or retaliation.

(2) Use locked seclusion, unless it is in a facility otherwise licensed or permitted by state law to use a locked room.

(3) Use a physical restraint technique that obstructs a pupil’s respiratory airway or impairs the pupil’s breathing or respiratory capacity, including techniques in which a staff member places pressure on a pupil’s back or places the staff member’s body weight against
 the pupil’s torso or back.

(4) Use a behavioral restraint technique that restricts breathing, including, but not limited to, using a pillow, blanket, carpet, mat, or other item to cover a pupil’s face.

(5) Use prone restraint.

(6) Use a behavioral restraint for longer than is necessary to contain the behavior that poses a clear and present danger of serious physical harm to the pupil or others.

(b) An educational provider shall keep constant, direct observation of a pupil who is in seclusion, which may be through observation of the pupil through a window, or another barrier, through which the educational provider is able to make direct eye contact with the
 pupil. The observation required pursuant to this subdivision shall not be through indirect means, including through a security camera or a closed-circuit television.

(c) An educational provider shall afford to pupils who are restrained the least restrictive alternative and the maximum freedom of movement, and shall use the least number of restraint points, while ensuring the physical safety of the pupil and others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 857, Sec. 3.   (SB 483)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

49006.

(a) A local educational agency that meets the definition of a “local educational agency” specified in Section 300.28 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall collect and, no later than three months after the end of a school year, report to the department annually on the use of behavioral restraints and seclusion for pupils enrolled in or served by the local educational agency for all or part of the prior school year.

(b) The report required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following information, disaggregated by race or ethnicity, and gender:

(1) The number of pupils subjected to mechanical restraint, with separate counts for pupils with a plan pursuant to Section 504 of
 the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils with an individualized education program, and pupils who do not have a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program.

(2) The number of pupils subjected to physical restraint, with separate counts for pupils with a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils with an individualized education program, and pupils who do not have a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program.

(3) The number of pupils subjected to seclusion, with separate counts for pupils with a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils with an individualized education
 program, and pupils who do not have a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program.

(4) The number of times mechanical restraint was used on pupils, with separate counts for the number of times mechanical restraint was used on pupils with a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils with an individualized education program, and pupils who do not have a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program.

(5) The number of times physical restraint was used on pupils, with separate counts for the number of times physical restraint was used on pupils with a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils with an
 individualized education program, and pupils who do not have a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program.

(6) The number of times seclusion was used on pupils, with separate counts for the number of times seclusion was used on pupils with a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils with an individualized education program, and pupils who do not have a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the data collected and reported pursuant to this section shall be available as a public record pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, and shall be posted annually on the
 internet website of the local educational agency.

(d) No later than three months after the report is due to the department pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall post the data from the report annually on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.   (AB 1466)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49006.2.

Notwithstanding Section 49006, the data collection and reporting requirements contained in this article shall be conducted in compliance with the requirements of the Civil Rights Data Collection of the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights imposed pursuant to Sections 100.6(b) and 104.61 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and shall not be construed to impose a new program or higher level of service on local educational agencies or nonpublic schools or agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49006.4.

(a) This article applies with regard to all pupils, including individuals with exceptional needs. For an individual with exceptional needs, if a behavioral restraint or seclusion is used, the procedures for followup contained in subdivisions (e), (f), (g), and (h) of Section 56521.1 also apply.

(b) For purposes of this section, “individual with exceptional needs” has the same meaning specified in Section 56026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 64.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Pupil Fees [49010. - 49014.]

49010.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Educational activity” means an activity offered by a school, school district, charter school, or county office of education that constitutes an integral fundamental part of elementary and secondary education, including, but not limited to, curricular and extracurricular activities.

(b) “Pupil fee” means a fee, deposit, or other charge imposed on pupils, or a pupil’s parents or guardians, in violation of Section 49011 and Section 5 of Article IX of the California Constitution, which require educational
 activities to be provided free of charge to all pupils without regard to their families’ ability or willingness to pay fees or request special waivers, as provided for in Hartzell v. Connell (1984) 35 Cal.3d 899. A pupil fee includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A fee charged to a pupil as a condition for registering for school or classes, or as a condition for participation in a class or an extracurricular activity, regardless of whether the class or activity is elective or compulsory, or is for credit.

(2) A security deposit, or other payment, that a pupil is required to make to obtain a lock, locker, book, class apparatus, musical instrument, uniform, or other materials or equipment.

(3) A purchase
 that a pupil is required to make to obtain materials, supplies, equipment, or uniforms associated with an educational activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

49011.

(a) A pupil enrolled in a public school shall not be required to pay a pupil fee for participation in an educational activity.

(b) All of the following requirements apply to the prohibition identified in subdivision (a):

(1) All supplies, materials, and equipment needed to participate in educational activities shall be provided to pupils free of charge.

(2) A fee waiver policy shall not make a pupil fee permissible.

(3) School districts and schools
 shall not establish a two-tier educational system by requiring a minimal educational standard and also offering a second, higher educational standard that pupils may only obtain through payment of a fee or purchase of additional supplies that the school district or school does not provide.

(4) A school district or school shall not offer course credit or privileges related to educational activities in exchange for money or donations of goods or services from a pupil or a pupil’s parents or guardians, and a school district or school shall not remove course credit or privileges related to educational activities, or otherwise discriminate against a pupil, because the pupil or the pupil’s parents or guardians did not or will not provide money or donations of goods or services to the school district or school.

(c) This article shall not be interpreted to prohibit solicitation of voluntary donations of funds or property, voluntary participation in fundraising activities, or school districts, schools, and other entities from providing pupils prizes or other recognition for voluntarily participating in fundraising activities.
